Utah statutes.
63G-2-302.   Private records.
(1)  The following records are private:
(a)  records concerning an individual's eligibility for unemployment insurance
benefits, social services, welfare benefits, or the determination of benefit
levels;
(b)  records containing data on individuals describing medical history,
diagnosis, condition, treatment, evaluation, or similar medical data;
(c)  records of publicly funded libraries that when examined alone or with
other records identify a patron;
(d)  records received by or generated by or for:
(i)  the Independent Legislative Ethics Commission, except for:
(A)  the commission's summary data report that is required under legislative
rule; and
(B)  any other document that is classified as public under legislative rule;
or
(ii)  a Senate or House Ethics Committee in relation to the review of ethics
complaints, unless the record is classified as public under legislative rule;
(e)  records received or generated for a Senate confirmation committee
concerning character, professional competence, or physical or mental health of
an individual:
(i)  if prior to the meeting, the chair of the committee determines release of
the records:
(A)  reasonably could be expected to interfere with the investigation
undertaken by the committee; or
(B)  would create a danger of depriving a person of a right to a fair
proceeding or impartial hearing; and
(ii)  after the meeting, if the meeting was closed to the public;
(f)  employment records concerning a current or former employee of, or
applicant for employment with, a governmental entity that would disclose that
individual's home address, home telephone number, Social Security number,
insurance coverage, marital status, or payroll deductions;
(g)  records or parts of records under Section 63G-2-303 that a current or
former employee identifies as private according to the requirements of that
section;
(h)  that part of a record indicating a person's Social Security number or
federal employer identification number if provided under Section 31A-23a-104,
31A-25-202, 31A-26-202, 58-1-301, 61-1-4, or 61-2f-203;
(i)  that part of a voter registration record identifying a voter's driver
license or identification card number, Social Security number, or last four
digits of the Social Security number;
(j)  a record that:
(i)  contains information about an individual;
(ii)  is voluntarily provided by the individual; and
(iii)  goes into an electronic database that:
(A)  is designated by and administered under the authority of the Chief
Information Officer; and
(B)  acts as a repository of information about the individual that can be
electronically retrieved and used to facilitate the individual's online
interaction with a state agency;
(k)  information provided to the Commissioner of Insurance under:
(i)  Subsection 31A-23a-115(2)(a);
(ii)  Subsection 31A-23a-302(3); or
(iii)  Subsection 31A-26-210(3);
(l)  information obtained through a criminal background check under Title 11,
Chapter 40, Criminal Background Checks by Political Subdivisions Operating
Water Systems;
(m)  information provided by an offender that is:
(i)  required by the registration requirements of Section 77-27-21.5; and
(ii)  not required to be made available to the public under Subsection
77-27-21.5(27); and
(n)  a statement and any supporting documentation filed with the attorney
general in accordance with Section 34-45-107, if the federal law or action
supporting the filing involves homeland security.
(2)  The following records are private if properly classified by a
governmental entity:
(a)  records concerning a current or former employee of, or applicant for
employment with a governmental entity, including performance evaluations and
personal status information such as race, religion, or disabilities, but not
including records that are public under Subsection 63G-2-301(2)(b) or
63G-2-301(3)(o), or private under Subsection (1)(b);
(b)  records describing an individual's finances, except that the following
are public:
(i)  records described in Subsection 63G-2-301(2);
(ii)  information provided to the governmental entity for the purpose of
complying with a financial assurance requirement; or
(iii)  records that must be disclosed in accordance with another statute;
(c)  records of independent state agencies if the disclosure of those records
would conflict with the fiduciary obligations of the agency;
(d)  other records containing data on individuals the disclosure of which
constitutes a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
(e)  records provided by the United States or by a government entity outside
the state that are given with the requirement that the records be managed as
private records, if the providing entity states in writing that the record
would not be subject to public disclosure if retained by it; and
(f)  any portion of a record in the custody of the Division of Aging and Adult
Services, created in Section 62A-3-102, that may disclose, or lead to the
discovery of, the identity of a person who made a report of alleged abuse,
neglect, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult.
(3) (a)  As used in this Subsection (3), "medical records" means medical
reports, records, statements, history, diagnosis, condition, treatment, and
evaluation.
(b)  Medical records in the possession of the University of Utah Hospital, its
clinics, doctors, or affiliated entities are not private records or controlled
records under Section 63G-2-304 when the records are sought:
(i)  in connection with any legal or administrative proceeding in which the
patient's physical, mental, or emotional condition is an element of any claim
or defense; or
(ii)  after a patient's death, in any legal or administrative proceeding in
which any party relies upon the condition as an element of the claim or
defense.
(c)  Medical records are subject to production in a legal or administrative
proceeding according to state or federal statutes or rules of procedure and
evidence as if the medical records were in the possession of a nongovernmental
medical care provider.
